Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 702.200, as amended by section 1, chapter 15, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
702.200. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Athletic association, conference or organization with authority over intercollegiate  sports”
includes the National Collegiate Athletic Association.
[(b) “Post-secondary institution of education” means: ]
[(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002. ]
[(B) An Oregon-based, generally accredited, private institution of higher education. ]
[(c)(A) ] (b)(A) “[ Student’s] Economic  rights” means the rights of a student  athlete  enrolled in
a post-secondary institution of education to earn compensation for use  of the [ student’s] student
athlete’s name, image, likeness or athletic reputation and to  contract with and retain professional
representation or an athlete agent.
(B) “[ Student’s] Economic rights” does not include a right to receive  compensation from a
post-secondary institution of education.
(c) “Post-secondary institution of education” means:
(A) A public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(B) An Oregon-based, generally accredited, private institution of higher education.
(2) A post-secondary institution of education may  compensate a student athlete or pro-
spective student athlete for use of the student athlete’s  or prospective student athlete’s
name, image, likeness or athletic reputation.
[(2)(a)] (3)(a)  Except as provided in this section, a post-secondary institution of  education or an
athletic association, conference or organization with authority over intercollegiate sports may not:
(A) Prohibit, prevent or restrict a student athlete from exercising [ the student’s ] economic
rights.
(B) Penalize or retaliate against a student athlete for exercising [ the student’s] economic rights.
(C) Prohibit a student  athlete from participating in an intercollegiate sport for exercising [ the
student’s] economic rights.
(D) Impose an eligibility requirement on a scholarship or grant that requires a student  athlete
to refrain from exercising [ the student’s ] economic rights.
Enrolled House Bill 3694 (HB 3694-BCCA) Page 1
(E) Prohibit a student athlete from  receiving food, drink, lodging or medical expenses or insur-
ance coverage from a third party as compensation for use of the [ student’s] student athlete’s  name,
image, likeness or athletic reputation.
(b) Except as  provided in this section, an athletic association, conference or organization with
authority over intercollegiate sports may not:
(A) Prevent a post-secondary institution of education or  a student athlete from participating in
intercollegiate  sports,  accept a complaint, open an investigation or take any other adverse action
against a post-secondary institution of education or a student athlete as a result of a violation,  or
an alleged violation, of the rules or regulations of the athletic  association, conference or organiza-
tion related to a student athlete exercising [ the student’s ] economic rights.
(B) Authorize, cause or allow any post-secondary institution of education that is a member  of
the association, conference or organization to take an action prohibited under paragraph (a)  of this
subsection.
[(3)(a)] (4)(a)  A student athlete may not enter into a contract that provides compensation to the
student athlete for use of the student athlete’s name, image, likeness or athletic  reputation if terms
of the contract  conflict with the student athlete’s team rules or with terms of a contract entered
into between the student athlete’s post-secondary institution of  education and a third party, except
neither the team  rules nor a contract entered into between the post-secondary institution of educa-
tion and a third party may prevent a student athlete from earning compensation for use  of the stu-
dent athlete’s name, image, likeness or athletic reputation when  not engaged in official team
activities, including participating in or  being part of an advertisement that was created while not
engaged in official team activities but that may otherwise be broadcasted, displayed or disseminated
at any time.
(b) A student athlete who enters into a  contract that provides compensation to the student
athlete for use of the student athlete’s  name, image, likeness or athletic reputation shall disclose the
contract for the sole purpose of demonstrating  compliance with paragraph (a) of this sub-
section to an official of the post-secondary institution of education designated  by the institution if
the student athlete is a team member or, if the student athlete is not a  team member, at the time
the student athlete seeks to become a team member.
(c) If the post-secondary institution of education asserts that the  terms of the contract conflict
with the team rules or with terms of a contract entered into between the student athlete’s post-
secondary institution of education and a third party, the institution shall disclose the specific rules
or terms asserted to be in conflict to the student athlete or to the student athlete’s  professional
representative or athlete agent if the student athlete is represented.
(d) Any contract, proposed  contract or related documentation in the possession of a
post-secondary institution of  education that relates to a student athlete’s exercise of eco-
nomic rights is confidential and exempt from public disclosure under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
[(4) A post-secondary institution of education or  an athletic association, conference or organization
with authority over intercollegiate sports may not provide to a prospective or current  student athlete
compensation for use of the student athlete’s name, image, likeness or athletic reputation. ]
[(5) A student athlete may not contract with or retain a person as the  student athlete’s athlete
agent, if the person represented or was employed by a post-secondary institution of education at any
time in the preceding four years. ]
[(6)] (5)  Nothing in this section prohibits a post-secondary institution of  education from estab-
lishing or enforcing a conduct code that is applicable to all students enrolled at the institution.
[(7)(a)] (6)(a) A student athlete’s  compensation for use of the [ student’s] student athlete’s  name,
image, likeness or athletic reputation may not be conditioned on the athletic performance of  the
student athlete.
(b) A person or entity that provides compensation to a student athlete for  the use of the student
athlete’s name, image, likeness or  athletic reputation may condition payment of the compensation
on a student athlete’s attendance at a particular post-secondary institution of education.
Enrolled House Bill 3694 (HB 3694-BCCA) Page 2
[(8)] (7)  An athletic association, conference or organization with  authority over intercollegiate
sports may not prohibit a post-secondary institution of education from  identifying, facilitating, ena-
bling or supporting  opportunities for a current student athlete to exercise the student athlete’s
[student’s] economic rights at the student athlete’s post-secondary institution of education.
[(9)] (8) A post-secondary institution of education,  or an employee of a post-secondary institution
of education, may not be held liable  for any damages to a student athlete’s ability to exercise the
student athlete’s [ student’s] economic rights due to any decision or action made by the post-
secondary institution of education or employee:
(a) That is routinely taken in the course of intercollegiate sports; or
(b) That is part of identifying, facilitating, enabling or supporting  opportunities for the current
student athlete to exercise the student athlete’s [ student’s] economic rights  at the student athlete’s
post-secondary institution of education.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House April 10, 2025
Repassed by House June 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 2, 2025
Repassed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3694 (HB 3694-BCCA) Page 3